District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.21

Review.

Any person aggrieved by an adverse action of the Mayor may file a request for a hearing with the Office of Administrative Hearings. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall provide the aggrieved person with an opportunity for a hearing and shall sustain, modify, or vacate such action by the Mayor as is appropriate in the case. Judicial review of the decision of the Office of Administrative Hearings shall be in accordance with [§ 2-1831.16].

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 22, 27 DCR 3528
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 75(b), 52 DCR 2638
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Office of Auditor abolished: The Office of the Auditor of the District of Columbia was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. All functions of the Office of the Auditor, including the functions of all officers, employees, and subordinate agencies were transferred to the Director, Department of General Administration by Reorganization Order No. 3 of the Board of Commissioners, dated August 28, 1952. The functions of auditing all moneys paid to and collected by the District Unemployment Board as provided in subsection (a) of this section was transferred from the Auditor to the Internal Audit Officer, Department of General Administration by Reorganization Order No. 19. The function of the Auditor of the District concerning the prior audit of refunds was transferred from the Auditor to the Accounting Officer, Finance Office, Department of General Administration by Reorganization Order No. 20, dated November 10, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 20 was superseded by Organization Order No. 121, dated December 12, 1957. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Reorganization Order No. 19 and Organization Order No. 121 were revoked and replaced by Organization Order No. 3, dated December 13, 1967. Parts IVB and IVC of the latter Order established within the newly created Department of General Administration, an Internal Audit Office and a Finance Office and prescribed the functions thereof. These functions were subsequently transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue by paragraph 4 of Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. Part IVB of Organization Order No. 3 and that portion of paragraph 4 of Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96 pertaining to a transfer of audit functions to the Department of Finance and Revenue were revoked by Organization Order No. 33, dated July 14, 1972. The latter Order established an Office of Municipal Audit and Inspection and prescribed the functions thereof. The Office of Municipal Audit and Inspection was replaced by Mayor’s Order No. 79-7, dated January 2, 1979, which Order established the Office of the Inspector General of the District of Columbia.

Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: The Office of the Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police was abolished and all functions of that office transferred to and vested in the Chief of Police. The Assistant Superintendent, Executive Officer of the Metropolitan Police Department was designated “Deputy Chief of Police, Executive Officer”; the Assistant Superintendent of the Metropolitan Police in command of the Detective Bureau was designated “Deputy Chief of Police, Chief of Detectives”; and each other Assistant Superintendent of the Metropolitan Police was designated “Deputy Chief of Police” by Reorganization Order No. 7 dated September 15, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 7 was replaced by Organization Order No. 153, dated November 10, 1966.

Amendment of Organization Order No. 112, Commissioners’ Order No. 55-1500, establishing Board of Appeals and Review: See Mayor’s Order 84-31, February 9, 1984.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
D.C. Law 15-354 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “Any person aggrieved by an adverse action of the Mayor may appeal to the Board of Appeals and Review established by Organization Order No. 112, dated August 15, 1955. The Board of Appeals and Review shall, in accordance with such Organization Order, and its rules of practice and procedure, provide the aggrieved person with an opportunity for a hearing and shall sustain, modify, or vacate such adverse action by the Mayor as is appropriate in the case. The decision of the Board of Appeals and Review shall be the final administrative remedy. Any person who is adversely affected by a decision of the Board of Appeals and Review may seek judicial review thereof in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2.”
1981 Ed., § 2-2021.